North Dakota, session 69, HB1371.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. LEGISLATIVE MANAGEMENT STUDY - PUBLIC EMPLOYEES RETIREMENT
SYSTEM UNIFORM GROUP INSURANCE PROGRAM HEALTH INSURANCE BENEFITS FOR
RETIRED PEACE OFFICERS. During the 2025-26 interim, the legislative management shall consider
studying the impact of providing uniform group insurance program health insurance benefits for retired
peace officers. The study must include a thorough review of benefits provided for peace officers and
consideration of health insurance benefit options, premium costs, eligibility requirements for retirement,
years of service limitations, eligibility for Medicare, potential costs to the state and political subdivisions,
the effect of providing benefits on recruitment and retention, any impact on the state's financial reporting
of postemployment benefit-related unfunded liability, and establishing a retired peace officer health
insurance pool. The legislative management shall report its findings and recommendations, together
with any legislation necessary to implement the recommendations, to the seventieth legislative
assembly.

H. B. NO. 1371 - PAGE 2
____________________________ ____________________________
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
____________________________ ____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House Secretary of the Senate
This certifies that the within bill originated in the House of Representatives of the Sixty-ninth Legislative
Assembly of North Dakota and is known on the records of that body as House Bill No. 1371.
House Vote: Yeas 57 Nays 32 Absent 5
Senate Vote: Yeas 45 Nays 1 Absent 1
____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State